Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB958.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 408.12(a) of the act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code, is amended to read:Section 408.12. Wine and Spirits Auction Permits.--(a) Upon application of:(1) any nonprofit hospital;1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 (2) any nonprofit public television station which is a member of the Pennsylvania Public Television Network;(3) any orchestra located in a county of the first, second or third class which is operated by a nonprofit corporation;(4) any museum located in a county of the first, second, third or fourth class which is operated by a nonprofit corporation;(5) any nonprofit corporation located in any county of the third class which trains and places dogs for people who are physically handicapped;(6) any nationally recognized community-based voluntary health organization committed to fighting cancer which has been in existence for at least ninety years;(7) any nationally recognized emergency response organization that offers humanitarian care to victims of war or natural disaster and has been in existence for at least one hundred twenty-five years;(8) any nationally recognized organization whose purpose is to serve as an agent to collect funds for local charities, as well as to coordinate relief services, counsel and refer clients to cooperating agencies and make emergency assistance grants and has been in existence for at least one hundred twenty years;(9) any hospice as defined under section 802.1 of the act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the "Health Care Facilities Act";(10) institution of higher education;(11) any nationally recognized community-based health organization committed to funding Type 1 Diabetes research;(12) any nationally recognized community-based voluntary health organization committed to fighting cancer which has been 20250SB0958PN1077 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in existence for at least twenty years;(13) any nonprofit organization [as] defined in [section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (Public Law 99-514, 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3))] accordance with 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) (relating to exemption from tax on corporations, certain trusts, etc.) and that is registered with the Bureau of Corporations and Charitable Organizations of the Department of State, recognized as a community-based voluntary organization committed to fighting cancer and has been in existence for at least five years; [or](14) any community-based voluntary health organization in a county of the second class which enriches the lives of children and young adults with disabilities and chronic illnesses; or(15) any private academic school licensed with the Department of Education or any nonpublic, nonlicensed school registered with the Department of Education;and upon payment of a fee of thirty dollars ($30) per day, the board shall issue a wine and spirits auction permit good for a period of not more than four consecutive or nonconsecutive days per calendar year.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0958PN1077 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122